Utah statutes.
57-27-201.   Disclosure of contaminated property required.
(1)  Subject to Section 57-1-37, if an owner or lessor of real property has
actual knowledge that the property is currently contaminated from the use,
storage, or manufacture of methamphetamines, the owner or lessor shall, in a
real property lease, conveyance, or other transaction related to the
contaminated property, disclose that the property is contaminated.
(2) (a)  If an owner's or lessor's real property is contaminated from the use,
storage, or manufacture of methamphetamines, the owner or lessor may report
the contaminated property to a government agency responsible for monitoring
the decontamination process and documenting that the test results meet
decontamination standards.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), an owner or lessor whose contaminated
property is reported in a police action related to the manufacturing of
methamphetamines shall be subject to the provisions of Title 19, Chapter 6,
Part 9, Illegal Drug Operations Site Reporting and Decontamination Act.
(3) (a)  A person may file a civil action to enforce this chapter.
(b)  A court may award a prevailing party damages, court costs, and reasonable
attorney fees for an action filed under this chapter.
